Materials for lyx workshop/LyX.app/Contents/Resources/dicts/ast_ES.dic
absorber/ADH
acollar/ADH
acordar/ADH
acostellar/ADH
actuar/ADH
adquirir/ADH
afacer/ADH
afiar/ADH
aforzar/ADH
agafentar/ADH
albortar/ADH
alendar/ADH
aliar/ADH
alpenzar/ADH
amacellar/ADH
amainar/ADH
amartellar/ADH
amestar/ADH
amorcellar/ADH
amormellar/ADH
amostrar/ADH
andar/ADH
aneblar/ADH
anovar/ADH
antecoyer/ADH
antever/ADH
apenzar/ADH
apiar/ADH
aporfiar/ADH
aportellar/ADH
apostar/ADH
aprender/ADH
arrastellar/ADH
arrebucir/ADH
arrecostar/ADH
arregucir/ADH
arremoyar/ADH
arrenegar/ADH
arreventar/ADH
arriar/ADH
arropellar/ADH
asalendar/ADH
ascender/ADH
asentar/ADH
asollar/ADH
astrayer/ADH
atartamellar/ADH
atender/ADH
atorcar/ADH
atrapellar/ADH
aunir/ADH
aventar/ADH
aviar/ADH
azogar/ADH
azubellar/ADH
bendicir/DH
buyir/DH
camentar/DH
carabellar/DH
castañolar/DH
cerrar/DH
collar/DH
competir/DH
comprobar/DH
concordar/DH
conducir/DH
conmover/DH
consentir/DH
consolar/DH
constituyir/DH
construyir/DH
contener/DH
contraponer/DH
contribuir/DH
convenir/DH
coñocer/DH
correr/DH
correxir/DH
coser/DH
coyer/DH
debullir/DH
decoyer/DH
demostrar/DH
deprender/DH
derromper/DH
desaferrar/DH
desamestar/DH
desamorgar/DH
desapertar/DH
desaprobar/DH
desasosegar/DH
desavenir/DH
descender/DH
descomponer/DH
desconocer/DH
descontar/DH
descoser/DH
desdicir/DH
desencoyer/DH
desengavellar/DH
desenllamorgar/DH
desenrestrar/DH
desenterrar/DH
desenvolver/DH
desfacer/DH
desgobernar/DH
despegar/DH
despesllar/DH
despoblar/DH
desprobar/DH
desterrar/DH
destituyir/DH
destravesar/DH
destruyir/DH
desvolver/DH
devolver/DH
dicir/DH
disolver/DH
disponer/DH
distribuir/DH
doler/DH
empapellar/ADH
empedrar/ADH
empenzar/ADH
emplegar/ADH
emponer/ADH
empostellar/ADH
emprecontar/ADH
encamentar/ADH
encibellar/ADH
encolmar/ADH
encomenzar/ADH
encornar/ADH
encuadrellar/ADH
endurnar/ADH
enfolgar/ADH
engrir/ADH
engurruñir/ADH
enllozar/ADH
enmendar/ADH
enrestrar/ADH
enrodellar/ADH
entainar/ADH
entecocer/ADH
entecruciar/ADH
enterrar/ADH
entetexer/ADH
entezar/ADH
entoyer/ADH
entrepernar/ADH
entrever/ADH
equivalir/ADH
esberrellar/ADH
escanadensar/ADH
escayer/ADH
escocer/ADH
escolmar/ADH
escomenzar/ADH
escomullir/ADH
escontar/ADH
escordar/ADH
escorrer/ADH
escostellar/ADH
escoyer/ADH
escripiase/ABDH
escudellar/ADH
escurubuzase/ABDH
lexicalizar/DH
litografiar/DH
llabializar/DH
llacar/DH
llaciar/DH
lladroniar/DH
llagrimexar/DH
llambiar/DH
llambiotar/DH
llambriar/DH
llamentar/DH
llaminar/DH
llampardiar/DH
llampuriar/DH
llanciar/DH
llaniar/DH
llanzar/DH
llaporiar/DH
llardiar/DH
llargar/DH
llarpiar/DH
llasiar/DH
llastir/DH
llatinizar/DH
llavotiar/DH
llazaroniar/DH
llegalizar/DH
lleldar/DH
llendar/DH
lletrizar/DH
lliar/DH
lliberar/DH
llicenciar/DH
llicuar/DH
llimir/DH
llindiar/DH
llitografiar/DH
llocalizar/DH
llograr/DH
lloqueriar/DH
lloramicar/DH
lloramiquiar/DH
lloramisquiar/DH
llorar/DH
lloricar/DH
lloriquiar/DH
llosar/DH
llovicar/DH
lloviscar/DH
llubricar/DH
llumbrir/DH
llurigar/DH
macetiar/DH
machacar/DH
machucar/DH
macizar/DH
macuciar/DH
madreñar/DH
mafecer/DH
magostar/DH
malaconseyar/DH
malcomer/DH
maldicir/DH
malfaer/DH
maliciar/DH
malparir/DH
malqueriar/DH
malvivir/DH
manifestar/DH
manuxar/DH
marellar/DH
merendar/DH
morrer/DH
mozcar/DH
nainar/DH
olecer/ADH
paluxar/DH
percibir/DH
pervenir/DH
placer/DH
poner/DH
predisponer/DH
presllar/DH
probar/DH
prostituir/DH
pruir/DH
rastrellar/DH
readautar/DH
recaer/DH
recocer/DH
reconstituyir/DH
recontar/DH
recoser/DH
recoyer/DH
redimir/DH
reescribir/DH
refaer/DH
refolgar/DH
regar/DH
rellucir/DH
remorder/DH
renacer/DH
renovar/DH
repegar/DH
repoblar/DH
reponer/DH
reproducir/DH
resgar/DH
resolver/DH
resquebrar/DH
restrinxir/DH
retexer/DH
retraer/DH
retrayer/DH
revenir/DH
rexir/DH
rodar/DH
romper/DH
ruar/DH
ruquir/DH
salir/DH
satisfacer/DH
sentar/DH
serrar/DH
siguir/DH
sobreponer/DH
sobrevenir/DH
socorrer/DH
soler/DH
somullir/DH
soñar/DH
sormellar/DH
soscribir/DH
sostener/DH
suponer/DH
suxerir/DH
tañer/DH
tataramellar/DH
tiñir/DH
tostar/DH
trasegar/DH
trenzar/DH
tresferir/DH
tresnochar/DH
tresvertir/DH
tronar/DH
tuir/DH
vender/DH
vertir/DH
volver/DH
xugar/DH
zucir/DH
